Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB596.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 403.725 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A petition for an order of protection may be filed by:
(a) A victim of domestic violence and abuse; or
(b) An adult on behalf of a victim who is a minor otherwise qualifying for relief
under this subsection.
(2) The petition may be filed in the victim's county of residence or a county where the
victim has fled to escape domestic violence and abuse.
(3) The petition shall be verified and contain:
(a) The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary
institution of the petitioner;
(b) The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary
institution of the person or persons who have engaged in the alleged act or
acts complained of in the petition;
(c) The facts and circumstances which constitute the basis for the petition;
(d) The date and place of the marriage of the parties, if applicable; and
(e) The names, ages, and addresses of the petitioner's minor children, if
applicable.
(4) The petition shall be filed on forms prescribed by the Administrative Office of the
Courts and provided to the person seeking relief by the circuit clerk or by another
individual authorized by the court to provide and verify petitions in emergency
situations, such as law enforcement officers, Commonwealth's or county attorneys,
and regional rape crisis centers or domestic violence shelters.
(5) All petitions requested, completed, and signed by persons seeking protection under
this chapter shall be accepted and filed with the court.
(6) (a) Jurisdiction over petitions filed under this chapter shall be concurrent between
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/12/2025 4:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 900
the District Court and Circuit Court and a petition may be filed by a petitioner
in either court, except that a petition shall be filed in a family court if one has
been established in the county where the petition is filed.
(b) The Court of Justice shall provide a protocol for twenty-four (24) hour access
to orders of protection in each county with any protocol, whether statewide or
local, being subject to Supreme Court review and approval of the initial
protocol and any subsequent amendments. This protocol may allow for
petitions to be filed in or transferred to a court other than those specified in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The Court of Justice may authorize by rule that petitions in a specific county
be filed in accordance with a supplemental jurisdictional protocol adopted for
that county. This protocol may provide for petitions to be filed in or
transferred to a court other than those specified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(d) 1. In addition to the protocols for twenty-four (24) hour access established
under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, [before January 1, 2019,
]the Court of Justice shall provide protocols for filing, including
electronic filing, of petitions for orders of protection:
a. At those regional rape crisis centers designated under KRS
211.600, or regional domestic violence shelters designated under
KRS 209A.045, that elect to participate in any county's twenty-
four (24) hour access protocol; and
b. By law enforcement officers.
2. These protocols shall be subject to Supreme Court review for approval
of the initial protocol and any subsequent amendments.
(7) Any judge to whom a petition is referred under subsection (6) of this section shall
have full authority to review and hear a petition and subsequently grant and enforce
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/12/2025 4:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 900
an order of protection.
(8) If the judge of a court in which there is a pending request for modification or
enforcement of an existing order of protection is unavailable or unable to act within
a reasonable time, the proceedings may be conducted by any judge of the county in
accordance with court rules.
Section 2. KRS 456.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A petition for an interpersonal protective order may be filed by:
(a) A victim of dating violence and abuse;
(b) A victim of stalking;
(c) A victim of sexual assault; or
(d) An adult on behalf of a victim who is a minor otherwise qualifying for relief
under this subsection.
(2) The petition may be filed in the victim's county of residence or a county where the
victim has fled to escape dating violence and abuse, stalking, or sexual assault.
(3) The petition shall be verified and contain:
(a) The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary
institution of the petitioner;
(b) The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary
institution of the person or persons who have engaged in the alleged act or
acts complained of in the petition;
(c) The facts and circumstances which constitute the basis for the petition; and
(d) The names, ages, and addresses of the petitioner's minor children, if
applicable.
(4) The petition shall be filed on forms prescribed by the Administrative Office of the
Courts and provided to the person seeking relief by the circuit clerk or by another
individual authorized by the court to provide and verify petitions in emergency
situations, such as law enforcement officers, Commonwealth's or county attorneys,
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/12/2025 4:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 900
and regional rape crisis centers or domestic violence shelters.
(5) All petitions requested, completed, and signed by persons seeking protection under
this chapter shall be accepted and filed with the court.
(6) (a) Jurisdiction over petitions filed under this chapter shall be concurrent between
the District Court and Circuit Court.
(b) The Court of Justice shall provide a protocol for twenty-four (24) hour access
to interpersonal protective orders in each county with any protocol, whether
statewide or local, being subject to Supreme Court review and approval of the
initial protocol and any subsequent amendments. This protocol may allow for
petitions to be filed in or transferred to a court other than those specified in
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) The Court of Justice may authorize by rule that petitions in a specific county
be filed in accordance with a supplemental jurisdictional protocol adopted for
that county. This protocol may provide for petitions to be filed in or
transferred to a court other than those specified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(d) 1. In addition to the protocols for twenty-four (24) hour access established
under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, [before January 1, 2019,
]the Court of Justice shall provide protocols for filing, including
electronic filing, of petitions for orders of protection:
a. At those regional rape crisis centers designated under KRS
211.600, or regional domestic violence shelters designated under
KRS 209A.045, that elect to participate in any county's twenty-
four (24) hour access protocol; and
b. By law enforcement officers.
2. These protocols shall be subject to Supreme Court review for approval
of the initial protocol and any subsequent amendments.
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/12/2025 4:19 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 900
(7) Any judge to whom a petition is referred under subsection (6) of this section shall
have full authority to review and hear a petition and subsequently grant and enforce
an interpersonal protective order.
(8) If the judge of a court in which there is a pending request for modification or
enforcement of an existing order of protection is unavailable or unable to act within
a reasonable time, the proceedings may be conducted by any judge of the county in
accordance with court rules.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/12/2025 4:19 PM Jacketed